hu: Kompatibilis érzékelőport típusa: Szint- és hőmérséklet-érzékelő port is; Nincs érzékelőport; Olajszint-érzékelő port; Olajhőmérséklet-érzékelő port; Egyéb
th: ประเภทพอร์ตเซ็นเซอร์ที่เข้ากันได้: พอร์ตวัดระดับและอุณหภูมิทั้งสองอย่าง; ไม่มีพอร์ตเซนเซอร์; พอร์ตเซนเซอร์วัดระดับน้ำมัน; พอร์ตเซนเซอร์วัดอุณหภูมิน้ำมัน; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 相容感測器孔位類型: 油位與溫度感測器連接埠皆有; 無感測器連接埠; 油位感測器連接埠; 油溫感測器連接埠; 其他
ru: Совместимый тип порта датчика: Порты уровня и температуры; Без порта датчика; Порт датчика уровня масла; Порт датчика температуры масла; Другое
pt-BR: Tipo de porta de sensor compatível: Ambas as portas de nível e temperatura; Sem porta de sensor; Porta do sensor de nível de óleo; Porta do sensor de temperatura do óleo; Outro
de: Kompatibler Sensoranschlusstyp: Anschlüsse für Füllstand und Temperatur; Kein Sensoranschluss; Ölstandssensor-Anschluss; Öltemperatursensor-Anschluss; Sonstige
ro-RO: Tip de port senzor compatibil: Porturi pentru nivel și temperatură; Fără port pentru senzor; Port pentru senzorul de nivel al uleiului; Port pentru senzorul de temperatură al uleiului; Altele
en: Compatible sensor port type: Both level & temperature ports; No sensor port; Oil level sensor port; Oil temperature sensor port; Other
sv: Kompatibel sensorporttyp: Portar för både nivå och temperatur; Ingen sensorport; Sensorport för oljenivå; Sensorport för oljetemperatur; Övrigt
nl: Compatibel sensorpoorttype: Niveau- en temperatuurpoorten; Geen sensorpoort; Poort voor oliepeilsensor; Poort voor olietemperatuursensor; Overige
zh-CN: 适配传感器端口类型: 液位与温度端口; 无传感器端口; 机油液位传感器端口; 机油温度传感器端口; 其他
ja: 対応センサーポートタイプ: レベル/温度ポート両方; センサーポートなし; オイルレベルセンサーポート; 油温センサーポート; その他
cs: Kompatibilní typ portu senzoru: Porty pro hladinu i teplotu; Bez portu pro senzor; Port senzoru hladiny oleje; Port senzoru teploty oleje; Jiné
hr-HR: Kompatibilni tip osjetnog priključka: Priključci za razinu i temperaturu; Bez priključka za senzor; Priključak senzora za razinu ulja; Priključak senzora za temperaturu ulja; Ostalo
vi: Loại cổng cảm biến tương thích: Cả cổng mức và cổng nhiệt độ; Không có cổng cảm biến; Cổng cảm biến mức dầu; Cổng cảm biến nhiệt độ dầu; Khác
es: Tipo de puerto de sensor compatible: Puertos de nivel y de temperatura; Sin puerto de sensor; Puerto para sensor de nivel de aceite; Puerto para sensor de temperatura de aceite; Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de porta de sensor compatível: Ambas as portas de nível e temperatura; Nenhuma porta de sensor; Porta de sensor do nível de óleo; Porta de sensor da temperatura do óleo; Outra
fi: Yhteensopiva anturin liitäntätyyppi: Sekä taso- että lämpötilaportit; Ei anturiporttia; Öljytason anturin portti; Öljyn lämpötila-anturin portti; Muu
bg-BG: Съвместим тип порт за сензор: Портове за ниво и температура; Без порт за сензор; Порт за сензор за ниво на маслото; Порт за сензор за температура на маслото; Друг
ko: 호환 센서 포트 유형: 레벨 및 온도 포트 모두; 센서 포트 없음; 오일 레벨 센서 포트; 오일 온도 센서 포트; 기타
tr: Uyumlu sensör bağlantı noktası tipi: Hem seviye hem sıcaklık bağlantı noktaları; Sensör bağlantı noktası yok; Yağ seviyesi sensörü bağlantı noktası; Yağ sıcaklık sensörü bağlantı noktası; Diğer
lt-LT: Suderinamas jutiklio jungties tipas: Tiek lygio, tiek temperatūros jungtys; Nėra jutiklio jungties; Alyvos lygio jutiklio jungtis; Alyvos temperatūros jutiklio jungtis; Kita
el: Συμβατός τύπος θύρας αισθητήρα: Θύρες στάθμης και θερμοκρασίας; Χωρίς θύρα αισθητήρα; Θύρα αισθητήρα στάθμης λαδιού; Θύρα αισθητήρα θερμοκρασίας λαδιού; Άλλο
fr: Type de port de capteur compatible: Ports de niveau et de température; Aucun port de capteur; Port de capteur de niveau d’huile; Port de capteur de température d’huile; Autre
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ portu snímača: Porty pre hladinu aj teplotu; Bez portu pre snímač; Port pre snímač hladiny oleja; Port pre snímač teploty oleja; Iné
da: Kompatibel sensortilslutningstype: Både niveau- og temperaturporte; Ingen sensorport; Olieniveausensorport; Olietermometersensorport; Andet
pl: Kompatybilny typ portu czujnika: Gniazdo poziomu i temperatury; Brak gniazda czujnika; Gniazdo czujnika poziomu oleju; Gniazdo czujnika temperatury oleju; Inne
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta odprtine za senzor: Priključka za raven in temperaturo; Brez priključka za senzor; Priključek za senzor ravni olja; Priključek za senzor temperature olja; Drugo
nb: Kompatibel sensorporttype: Både nivå- og temperaturporter; Ingen sensorport; Oljenivåsensorport; Oljetemperatursensorport; Annet
it: Tipo di porta sensore compatibile: Porte sia per livello che per temperatura; Nessuna porta sensore; Porta sensore di livello dell'olio; Porta sensore di temperatura dell'olio; Altro